src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-issues_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - псака: # Ordinary nouns - full paradigm including MWN
    псака+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: псака
    псака+N+SP+Gen+Indef: псакань
    псака+N+SP+Abl+Indef: псакадо
    карь+N+SP+Abl+Indef: карде
    карь+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg2: кардят
    псака+N+SP+Dat+Indef: псаканень
    псака+N+SP+Com+Indef: псаканек
    псака+N+SP+Abe+Indef: псакавтомо
    псака+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: псакашка
    псака+N+SP+Ine+Indef: псакасо
    псака+N+SP+Ela+Indef: псакасто
    псака+N+SP+Ill+Indef: псакас
    псака+N+SP+Prl+Indef: псакава
    псака+N+SP+Tra+Indef: псакакс
